Idaho, session 2025, H0140.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The Legislature finds and declares
that:
(1) Changing clocks between Standard Time and Daylight Saving Time is
disruptive to health, safety, education, and the economy.
(2) Federal law permits observance of only permanent Standard Time by a
state exempting itself from Daylight Saving Time as the alternative to bian-
nual changing of clocks.
(3) Permanent Daylight Saving Time has been repealed in the past due to
its harm to health, safety, education, and the economy soon after its trials
during World War II and the Oil Crisis of the 1970s.
(4) Permanent Standard Time has historically proven to exist without
incident for decades.
(5) The American Academy of Sleep Medicine, the National Sleep Founda-
tion, the Sleep Research Society, and the Society for Research on Biological
Rhythms advise against permanent Daylight Saving Time and recommend perma-
nent Standard Time.
(6) Standard Time is intended to approximate natural solar time.
(7) Coordination with contiguous states regarding timekeeping is es-
sential to convenience of commerce.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 96, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 1, Title 73, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 73-123, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
73-123. EXEMPTION FROM DAYLIGHT SAVING TIME IN THE MOUNTAIN TIME ZONE
PORTION. (1) The state of Idaho hereby exempts the portion of the state that


is in the mountain time zone from the daylight saving time provisions of 15
U.S.C. 260a.
(2) If the United States congress enacts legislation to mandate per-
manent daylight saving time in a majority of all states, the state of Idaho
shall conform to such new federal law.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 1, Title 73, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 73-124, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
73-124. EXEMPTION FROM DAYLIGHT SAVING TIME IN THE PACIFIC TIME ZONE
PORTION. (1) The state of Idaho hereby exempts the portion of the state that
is in the Pacific time zone from the daylight saving time provisions of 15
U.S.C. 260a.
(2) If the United States congress enacts legislation to mandate per-
manent daylight saving time in a majority of all states, the state of Idaho
shall conform to such new federal law.
SECTION 5. Section 3 of this act shall be in full force and effect on and
after January 1 of the first year following or coinciding with effectuation
of exemption from Daylight Saving Time in the portion of the state of Oregon
that is in the Mountain Time Zone. Sections 2 and 4 of this act shall be in
full force and effect on and after January 1 of the first year following or
coinciding with effectuation of exemption from Daylight Saving Time in the
state of Washington.